Idaho, session 2025, H0486.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 27, Title 44, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. That Title 44, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 27, Title 44, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 27
RESTRICTION ON COVENANTS NOT TO COMPETE
44-2701. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Adjudication" means litigation, arbitration, and mediation.
(2) "Covenant not to compete" means:
(a) Every written or oral covenant, agreement, or contract between an
employee or independent contractor and an employer or contractor that,
following termination of the employment or contract, restricts the em-
ployee or independent contractor from engaging in a lawful profession,
trade, or business of any kind:
(i) For another employer for a specified period of time;
(ii) In a specified geographical area; or
(iii) For another employer in a capacity that is similar to the em-
ployee's work for the employer that is party to the agreement;
(b) An agreement that directly or indirectly prohibits the acceptance
or transaction of business with a customer; or
(c) Any provision in an agreement that threatens, demands, requires,
or otherwise effectuates that an individual return, repay, or forfeit
any right, benefit, or compensation as a consequence of the individual
engaging in a lawful profession, trade, or business of any kind.
(d) "Covenant not to compete" does not include:
(i) A nondisclosure agreement or agreement designed to protect
trade secrets or confidential information; or
(ii) A non-solicitation agreement or agreement restricting the
ability to use client or contact lists or solicit customers of the
employer.


(3) "Employer" means any individual, partnership, association, corpo-
ration, business, trust, or any person or group of persons acting directly or
indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee or an in-
dependent contractor.
(4) "Employee" means any individual who performs services for an em-
ployer, including an independent contractor.
(5) "Independent contractor" means any individual whose employment is
governed by a contract and whose compensation is not reported to the inter-
nal revenue service on a W-2 form. For purposes of this section, independent
contractor also includes any corporation, limited liability corporation,
partnership, or other corporate entity when an employer requires an individ-
ual to form such an organization for purposes of entering into a contract for
services as a condition of receiving compensation under an independent con-
tractor agreement.
44-2702. COVENANTS NOT TO COMPETE ARE VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE. Except
as otherwise provided for in this chapter, a covenant not to compete con-
tained in a contract or agreement is void and unenforceable.
44-2703. EXCEPTIONS. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
44-2702, Idaho Code, a covenant not to compete is valid and enforceable if:
(1) The covenant not to compete is agreed on during the sale of a busi-
ness. The person selling the business and the partners, members, or share-
holders and the buyer of the business may agree on a temporary and geographi-
cally restricted covenant not to compete that will prohibit the seller of the
business from carrying on a similar business within a reasonable geographic
area and for a reasonable length of time;
(2) The covenant not to compete is agreed on in anticipation of the dis-
solution of a business. The partners, members, or shareholders, upon or in
anticipation of a dissolution of a partnership, limited liability company,
or corporation, may agree that all or any number of the parties will not carry
on a similar business within a reasonable geographic area where the business
has been transacted; or
(3) The covenant not to compete covers an employee who earns two hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or more per year.
44-2704. CHOICE OF LAW -- VENUE. (1) An employer shall not require an
employee who primarily resides and works in Idaho, as a condition of employ-
ment, to agree to a provision in an agreement or contract that would do either
of the following:
(a) Require the employee to adjudicate outside of Idaho a claim arising
in Idaho; or
(b) Deprive the employee of the substantive protection of Idaho law
with respect to a controversy arising in Idaho.
(2) Any provision of a contract or agreement that violates this section
is voidable at any time by the employee and, if a provision is rendered void
at the request of the employee, the matter shall be adjudicated in Idaho and
Idaho law shall govern such dispute.


44-2705. ENFORCEABILITY -- ATTORNEY'S FEES. (1) Nothing in this chap-
ter shall be construed to render void or unenforceable any other provisions
in a contract or agreement containing a void or unenforceable covenant not to
compete.
(2) In addition to injunctive relief and any other remedies as may be
provided by law, a court may award reasonable attorney's fees to an employee
or independent contractor who prevails in enforcing his rights under this
chapter.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.